Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2734
Quarantine, defined.

Quarantine means an imposed restriction by the department prohibiting movement of animals to any location without specific written permits and prohibition of use by the department of the premises, vehicles, and equipment used for such animals or flocks.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 34.